Florida, session 2026, HB841.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
11
12 Section 1. Section 320.06, Florida Statutes, is amended to
13 read:
14 320.06 Registration certificates and, license plates;, and
15 validation stickers generally.—
16 (1)(a) Upon the receipt of an initial application for
17 registration and payment of the appropriate license tax and
18 other fees required by law, the department shall assign to the
19 motor vehicle a registration license number consisting of
20 letters and numerals or numerals and issue to the owner or
21 lessee a certificate of registration and one registration
22 license plate, unless two plates are required for display by s.
23 320.0706, for each vehicle so registered.
24 (b)1. Registration license plates bearing a graphic symbol
25 and the alphanumeric system of identification shall be issued
Page 1 of 10
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb841-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 841 2026
26 for a 10-year period. At the end of the 10-year period, upon
27 renewal, the plate shall be replaced. The department shall
28 extend the scheduled license plate replacement date from a 6-
29 year period to a 10-year period. The fee for such replacement is
30 $28, $2.80 of which shall be paid each year before the plate is
31 replaced, to be credited toward the next $28 replacement fee.
32 The fees shall be deposited into the Highway Safety Operating
33 Trust Fund. A credit or refund may not be given for any prior
34 years' payments of the prorated replacement fee if the plate is
35 replaced or surrendered before the end of the 10-year period,
36 except that a credit may be given if a registrant is required by
37 the department to replace a license plate under s.
38 320.08056(8)(a). With each license plate, a validation sticker
39 shall be issued showing the owner's birth month, license plate
40 number, and the year of expiration or the appropriate renewal
41 period if the owner is not a natural person. The validation
42 sticker shall be placed on the upper right corner of the license
43 plate. The license plate and validation sticker shall be issued
44 based on the applicant's appropriate renewal period. The
45 registration period is 12 months, the extended registration
46 period is 24 months, and all expirations occur based on the
47 applicant's appropriate registration period. Rental vehicles
48 taxed pursuant to s. 320.08(6)(a) and rental trucks taxed
49 pursuant to s. 320.08(3)(a)-(c) and (4)(a)-(d) may elect a
50 permanent registration period, provided payment of the
Page 2 of 10
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb841-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 841 2026
51 appropriate license taxes and fees occurs annually.
52 2. Beginning July 1, 2024, A vehicle registered in
53 accordance with the International Registration Plan must be
54 issued a license plate for a 3-year period. At the end of the 3-
55 year period, upon renewal, the license plate must be replaced.
56 Each license plate must include a validation sticker showing the
57 month of expiration. A cab card denoting the declared gross
58 vehicle weight for each apportioned jurisdiction must be issued
59 annually. The fee for an original or a renewal cab card is $28,
60 which must be deposited into the Highway Safety Operating Trust
61 Fund. If the license plate is damaged or worn, it may be
62 replaced at no charge by applying to the department and
63 surrendering the current license plate.
64 3. In order to retain the efficient administration of the
65 taxes and fees imposed by this chapter, the 80-cent fee increase
66 in the replacement fee imposed by chapter 2009-71, Laws of
67 Florida, is negated as provided in s. 320.0804.
68 (c) Registration license plates equipped with validation
69 stickers subject to the registration period are valid for not
70 more than 12 months and expire at midnight on the last day of
71 the registration period. A registration license plate equipped
72 with a validation sticker subject to the extended registration
73 period is valid for not more than 24 months and expires at
74 midnight on the last day of the extended registration period. A
75 registration license plate equipped with a validation sticker
Page 3 of 10
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb841-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 841 2026
76 subject to a permanent registration period is permanently valid
77 but shall become void if appropriate license taxes and fees are
78 not paid annually. For each registration period after the one in
79 which the metal registration license plate is issued, and until
80 the license plate is required to be replaced, the renewal shall
81 be recorded electronically a validation sticker showing the
82 month and year of expiration shall be issued upon payment of the
83 proper license tax amount and fees and is valid for not more
84 than 12 months. For each extended registration period occurring
85 after the one in which the metal registration license plate is
86 issued and until the license plate is required to be replaced,
87 the renewal shall be recorded electronically a validation
88 sticker showing the year of expiration shall be issued upon
89 payment of the proper license tax amount and fees and is valid
90 for not more than 24 months. For each permanent registration
91 period occurring after the one in which the metal registration
92 license plate is issued and until the license plate is required
93 to be replaced, the renewal shall be recorded electronically a
94 validation sticker showing a permanent registration period shall
95 be issued upon payment of the proper license tax amount and fees
96 and is permanently valid but shall become void if the proper
97 license taxes and fees are not paid annually. When license
98 plates equipped with validation stickers are issued in any month
99 other than the owner's birth month or the designated
100 registration period for any other motor vehicle, the effective
Page 4 of 10
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb841-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 841 2026
101 date shall reflect the birth month or month and the year of
102 renewal. However, when a license plate or validation sticker is
103 issued for a period of less than 12 months, the applicant shall
104 pay the appropriate amount of license tax and the applicable fee
105 under s. 320.14 in addition to all other fees. Validation
106 stickers issued for vehicles taxed under s. 320.08(6)(a), for
107 any company that owns 250 vehicles or more, or for semitrailers
108 taxed under the provisions of s. 320.08(5)(a), for any company
109 that owns 50 vehicles or more, may be placed on any vehicle in
110 the fleet so long as the vehicle receiving the validation
111 sticker has the same owner's name and address as the vehicle to
112 which the validation sticker was originally assigned.
113 (2) The department shall provide the several tax
114 collectors and license plate agents with the necessary number of
115 validation stickers.
116 (2)(3)(a) Registration license plates must be made of
117 metal specially treated with a retroreflection material, as
118 specified by the department. The registration license plate is
119 designed to increase nighttime visibility and legibility and
120 must be at least 6 inches wide and not less than 12 inches in
121 length, unless a plate with reduced dimensions is deemed
122 necessary by the department to accommodate motorcycles, mopeds,
123 similar smaller vehicles, or trailers. Validation stickers must
124 also be treated with a retroreflection material, must be of such
125 size as specified by the department, and must adhere to the
Page 5 of 10
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb841-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 841 2026
126 license plate. The registration license plate must be imprinted
127 with a combination of bold letters and numerals or numerals, not
128 to exceed seven digits, to identify the registration license
129 plate number. The license plate must be imprinted with the word
130 "Florida" at the top and the name of the county in which it is
131 sold, the state motto, or the words "Sunshine State" at the
132 bottom. Apportioned license plates must have the word
133 "Apportioned" at the bottom, and license plates issued for
134 vehicles taxed under s. 320.08(3)(d), (4)(m) or (n), (5)(b) or
135 (c), or (14) must have the word "Restricted" at the bottom.
136 License plates issued for vehicles taxed under s. 320.08(12)
137 must be imprinted with the word "Florida" at the top and the
138 word "Dealer" at the bottom unless the license plate is a
139 specialty license plate as authorized in s. 320.08056.
140 Manufacturer license plates issued for vehicles taxed under s.
141 320.08(12) must be imprinted with the word "Florida" at the top
142 and the word "Manufacturer" at the bottom. License plates issued
143 for vehicles taxed under s. 320.08(5)(d) or (e) must be
144 imprinted with the word "Wrecker" at the bottom. Any county may,
145 upon majority vote of the county commission, elect to have the
146 county name removed from the license plates sold in that county.
147 The state motto or the words "Sunshine State" shall be printed
148 in lieu thereof. A license plate issued for a vehicle taxed
149 under s. 320.08(6) may not be assigned a registration license
150 number, or be issued with any other distinctive character or
Page 6 of 10
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb841-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 841 2026
151 designation, that distinguishes the motor vehicle as a for-hire
152 motor vehicle.
153 (b) An additional fee of 50 cents shall be collected on
154 each motor vehicle registration or motor vehicle renewal
155 registration issued in this state in order for all license
156 plates and validation stickers to be fully treated with
157 retroreflection material. The fee shall be deposited into the
158 Highway Safety Operating Trust Fund.
159 (3)(4) The corporation organized under chapter 946 may
160 manufacture license plates, validation stickers, and decals, as
161 well as temporary tags, disabled hang tags, vessel decals, and
162 fuel use decals, for the Department of Highway Safety and Motor
163 Vehicles as provided in this chapter and chapter 327. The
164 Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles is not required
165 to obtain competitive bids in order to contract with the
166 corporation.
167 (4)(5) The department may conduct a pilot program to
168 evaluate the designs, concepts, and technologies for alternative
169 license plates. For purposes of the pilot program, the
170 department shall investigate the feasibility and use of
171 alternative license plate technologies and the long-term cost
172 impact to the consumer. The pilot program shall be limited to
173 license plates that are used on government-owned motor vehicles
174 as described in s. 320.0655. Such license plates are exempt from
175 the requirements in paragraph (2)(a) (3)(a).
Page 7 of 10
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb841-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 841 2026
176 (5)(6) All license plates issued pursuant to this chapter
177 are the property of this the state.
178 Section 2. Paragraphs (a) and (b) of subsection (1) of
179 section 320.04, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
180 320.04 Registration service charge.—
181 (1)(a) A service charge of $2.50 shall be imposed on each
182 application that is handled in connection with original
183 issuance, duplicate issuance, or transfer of a license plate or,
184 mobile home sticker, or validation sticker or with transfer or
185 duplicate issuance of a registration certificate. This service
186 charge shall be retained by the department or by the tax
187 collector, as the case may be, as other fees accruing to those
188 offices.
189 (b) A service charge of $1 shall also be imposed for the
190 issuance of each license plate validation sticker, vessel decal,
191 and mobile home sticker issued from an automated vending
192 facility or printer dispenser machine. This service charge is
193 payable to the department and shall be used to provide for
194 automated vending facilities or printer dispenser machines that
195 are used to dispense such stickers and decals by each tax
196 collector's or license tag agent's employee.
197 Section 3. Section 320.08035, Florida Statutes, is amended
198 to read:
199 320.08035 Persons who have disabilities; reduced dimension
200 license plate.—The owner or lessee of a motorcycle, moped, or
Page 8 of 10
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb841-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 841 2026
201 motorized disability access vehicle who resides in this state
202 and qualifies for a parking permit for a person who has a
203 disability under s. 320.0848, upon application and payment of
204 the appropriate license tax and fees under s. 320.08(1), must be
205 issued a license plate that has reduced dimensions as provided
206 under s. 320.06(2)(a) s. 320.06(3)(a). The plate must be stamped
207 with the international symbol of accessibility after the numeric
208 and alpha serial number of the license plate. The plate entitles
209 the person to all privileges afforded by a disabled parking
210 permit issued under s. 320.0848.
211 Section 4. Subsection (4) of section 320.0807, Florida
212 Statutes, is amended to read:
213 320.0807 Special license plates for Governor and federal
214 and state legislators.—
215 (4) License plates purchased under subsection (1),
216 subsection (2), or subsection (3) shall be replaced by the
217 department at no cost, other than the fees required under ss.
218 320.04 and 320.06(2)(b) 320.06(3)(b), when the person to whom
219 the plates have been issued leaves the elective office with
220 respect to which the license plates were issued. Within 30 days
221 after leaving office, the person to whom the license plates have
222 been issued must apply to the department for a replacement
223 license plate. The person may return the prestige license plates
224 to the department or retain the plates as souvenirs. Upon
225 receipt of the replacement license plate, the person may not
Page 9 of 10
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb841-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 841 2026
226 display on any vehicle the prestige license plate or plates
227 issued with respect to his or her former office.
228 Section 5. Paragraph (b) of subsection (4) of section
229 320.084, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
230 320.084 Free motor vehicle license plate to certain
231 disabled veterans.—
232 (4)
233 (b) There shall be a service charge in accordance with the
234 provisions of s. 320.04 for each initial application or renewal
235 of registration and an additional sum of 50 cents on each
236 license plate and validation sticker as provided in s.
237 320.06(2)(b) s. 320.06(3)(b).
238 Section 6. Section 320.102, Florida Statutes, is amended
239 to read:
240 320.102 Marine boat trailers owned by nonprofit
241 organizations; exemptions.—The registration or renewal of a
242 registration of any marine boat trailer owned and operated by a
243 nonprofit organization that is exempt from federal income tax
244 under s. 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and which is
245 used exclusively in carrying out its customary nonprofit
246 activities is exempt from paying the fees, taxes, surcharges,
247 and charges in ss. 320.03(5), (6), and (9), 320.031(2),
248 320.04(1), 320.06(1)(b) and (2)(b) (3)(b), 320.0801, 320.0802,
249 320.0804, and 320.08046.
250 Section 7. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 10 of 10
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb841-01-c1